Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.135

Suspension or restriction orders—Show cause hearing.

(1) Upon an order of a disciplining authority to summarily suspend a license, or restrict or limit a license holder's practice pursuant to RCW 18.130.050 or 18.130.062, the license holder is entitled to a show cause hearing before a panel or the secretary as identified in subsection (2) of this section within fourteen days of requesting a show cause hearing. The license holder must request the show cause hearing within twenty days of the issuance of the order. At the show cause hearing, the disciplining authority has the burden of demonstrating that more probable than not, the license holder poses an immediate threat to the public health and safety. The license holder must request a hearing regarding the statement of charges in accordance with RCW 18.130.090.

(2)(a) In the case of a license holder who is regulated by a board or commission identified in RCW 18.130.040(2)(b), the show cause hearing must be held by a panel of the appropriate board or commission.

(b) In the case of a license holder who is regulated by the secretary under RCW 18.130.040(2)(a), the show cause hearing must be held by the secretary.

(3) At the show cause hearing, the show cause hearing panel or the secretary may consider the statement of charges, the motion, and documents supporting the request for summary action, the respondent's answer to the statement of charges, and shall provide the license holder with an opportunity to provide documentary evidence and written testimony, and be represented by counsel. Prior to the show cause hearing, the disciplining authority shall provide the license holder with all documentation in support of the charges against the license holder.

(4)(a) If the show cause hearing panel or secretary determines that the license holder does not pose an immediate threat to the public health and safety, the panel or secretary may overturn the summary suspension or restriction order.

(b) If the show cause hearing panel or secretary determines that the license holder poses an immediate threat to the public health and safety, the summary suspension or restriction order shall remain in effect. The show cause hearing panel or secretary may amend the order as long as the amended order ensures that the license holder will no longer pose an immediate threat to the public health and safety.

(5) Within forty-five days of the show cause hearing panel's or secretary's determination to sustain the summary suspension or place restrictions on the license, the license holder may request a full hearing on the merits of the disciplining authority's decision to suspend or restrict the license. A full hearing must be provided within forty-five days of receipt of the request for a hearing, unless stipulated otherwise.

[ 2008 c 134 s 6.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—2008 c 134: See notes following RCW 18.130.020.